lib/dict/lv_LV.aff
SFX 3 Y 40
SFX 3   st   ðu    [^ie]st
SFX 3   t    0     [^ie]st
SFX 3   st   ð     [^ie]st
SFX 3   st   ðam   [^ie]st
SFX 3   st   ðat   [^ie]st
SFX 3   st   ðot   [^ie]st
SFX 3   t    iet   [^ie]st
SFX 3   st   ðu    [^m]est
SFX 3   t    0     [^m]est
SFX 3   st   ð     [^m]est
SFX 3   st   ðam   [^m]est
SFX 3   st   ðat   [^m]est
SFX 3   st   ðot   [^m]est
SFX 3   t    iet   [^m]est
SFX 3   st   tu    [m]est
SFX 3   st   t     [m]est
SFX 3   st   tam   [m]est
SFX 3   st   tat   [m]est
SFX 3   st   tot   [m]est
SFX 3   st   tiet  [m]est
SFX 3   st   tu   [^r]ist
SFX 3   st   t    [^r]ist
SFX 3   st   tam  [^r]ist
SFX 3   st   tat  [^r]ist
SFX 3   st   tot  [^r]ist
SFX 3   st   tiet [^r]ist
SFX 3  ist   îtu   [r]ist
SFX 3  ist   îti   [r]ist
SFX 3  ist   ît    [r]ist
SFX 3  ist   îtam  [r]ist
SFX 3  ist   îtat  [r]ist
SFX 3  ist   îtot  [r]ist
SFX 3  ist   îtiet [r]ist
SFX 3  ikt   îku    [i]kt
SFX 3  ikt   îc     [i]kt
SFX 3  ikt   îk     [i]kt
SFX 3  ikt   îkam   [i]kt
SFX 3  ikt   îkat   [i]kt
SFX 3  t     ðot    [i]kt
SFX 3  ikt   îciet  [i]kt

SFX 7 Y 132
SFX 7  t   stu   [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  t   sti   [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  t   st    [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  t   stam  [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  t   stat  [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  t   stot  [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  t   stiet [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  0   u    [z]t
SFX 7  0   i    [z]t
SFX 7  0   am   [z]t
SFX 7  0   at   [z]t
SFX 7  0   ot   [z]t
SFX 7  0   iet  [z]t
SFX 7  0   u    [^ir]st
SFX 7  0   i    [^ir]st
SFX 7  0   am   [^ir]st
SFX 7  0   at   [^ir]st
SFX 7  0   ot   [^ir]st
SFX 7  0   iet  [^ir]st
SFX 7  irst çrtu   irst
SFX 7  irst çrt    irst
SFX 7  irst çrtam  irst
SFX 7  irst çrtat  irst
SFX 7  irst çrtot  irst
SFX 7  irst çrtiet irst
SFX 7  0   u    [^z]ist
SFX 7  0   i    [^z]ist
SFX 7  0   am   [^z]ist
SFX 7  0   at   [^z]ist
SFX 7  0   ot   [^z]ist
SFX 7  0   iet  [^z]ist
SFX 7  st  estu    [z]ist
SFX 7  st  esti    [z]ist
SFX 7  st  estam   [z]ist
SFX 7  st  estat   [z]ist
SFX 7  st  estot   [z]ist
SFX 7  st  estiet  [z]ist
SFX 7  gt  egu    igt
SFX 7  gt  edz    igt
SFX 7  gt  eg     igt
SFX 7  gt  egam   igt
SFX 7  gt  egat   igt
SFX 7  gt  edziet igt
SFX 7  gt  egot   igt
SFX 7  agt ogu     agt
SFX 7  agt odz     agt
SFX 7  agt og      agt
SFX 7  agt ogam    agt
SFX 7  agt ogat    agt
SFX 7  agt odziet  agt
SFX 7  agt ogot    agt
SFX 7  t   stu   [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  t   sti   [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  t   st    [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  t   stam  [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  t   stat  [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  t   stot  [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  t   stiet [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  akt  oku   akt
SFX 7  akt  oc    akt
SFX 7  akt  ok    akt
SFX 7  akt  okam  akt
SFX 7  akt  okat  akt
SFX 7  akt  ociet akt
SFX 7  akt  okot  akt
SFX 7  kt  eku      ikt
SFX 7  kt  ec       ikt
SFX 7  kt  ek       ikt
SFX 7  kt  ekam     ikt
SFX 7  kt  ekat     ikt
SFX 7  kt  eciet    ikt
SFX 7  kt  ekot     ikt
SFX 7  ukt  ûku    ukt
SFX 7  ukt  ûc     ukt
SFX 7  ukt  ûk     ukt
SFX 7  ukt  ûkam   ukt
SFX 7  ukt  ûkat   ukt
SFX 7  ukt  ûciet  ukt
SFX 7  ukt  ûkot   ukt
SFX 7  ilkt  elku   [i]lkt
SFX 7  ilkt  elc    [i]lkt
SFX 7  ilkt  elk    [i]lkt
SFX 7  ilkt  elkam  [i]lkt
SFX 7  ilkt  elkat  [i]lkt
SFX 7  ilkt  elciet [i]lkt
SFX 7  ilkt  elkot  [i]lkt
SFX 7  t   stu     [a]lkt
SFX 7  t   sti     [a]lkt
SFX 7  t   st      [a]lkt
SFX 7  t   stam    [a]lkt
SFX 7  t   stat    [a]lkt
SFX 7  t   stot    [a]lkt
SFX 7  t   stiet   [a]lkt
SFX 7  irkt  çrku    irkt
SFX 7  irkt  çrk     irkt
SFX 7  irkt  çrkam   irkt
SFX 7  irkt  çrkat   irkt
SFX 7  irkt  çrciet  irkt
SFX 7  irkt  çrkot   irkt
SFX 7  t   stu   [^air]pt
SFX 7  t   sti   [^air]pt
SFX 7  t   st    [^air]pt
SFX 7  t   stam  [^air]pt
SFX 7  t   stat  [^air]pt
SFX 7  t   stot  [^air]pt
SFX 7  t   stiet [^air]pt
SFX 7  ipt  îpu    ipt
SFX 7  ipt  îpi    ipt
SFX 7  ipt  îp     ipt
SFX 7  ipt  îpam   ipt
SFX 7  ipt  îpat   ipt
SFX 7  ipt  îpiet  ipt
SFX 7  ipt  îpot   ipt
SFX 7  apt  opu    apt
SFX 7  apt  opi    apt
SFX 7  apt  op     apt
SFX 7  apt  opam   apt
SFX 7  apt  opat   apt
SFX 7  apt  opiet  apt
SFX 7  apt  opot   apt
SFX 7  irpt  çrpu   irpt
SFX 7  irpt  çrp    irpt
SFX 7  irpt  çrpam  irpt
SFX 7  irpt  çrpat  irpt
SFX 7  irpt  çrpiet irpt
SFX 7  irpt  çrpot  irpt
SFX 7  t  nu   et
SFX 7  t  n    et
SFX 7  t  nam  et
SFX 7  t  nat  et
SFX 7  t  niet et
SFX 7  t  not  et

SFX H Y 6
SFX H   t   ju    [âçîoû]t
SFX H   t   0     [âçîoû]t
SFX H   t   jam   [âçîoû]t
SFX H   t   jat   [âçîoû]t
SFX H   t   jiet  [âçîoû]t
SFX H   t   jot   [âçîoû]t


SFX G Y 5
SFX G   t   jas     [âçîoû]t
SFX G   t   jamies  [âçîoû]t
SFX G   t   jaties  [âçîoû]t
SFX G   t   jieties [âçîoû]t
SFX G   t   joties  [âçîoû]t

SFX C Y 20
SFX C  ât  u       [^j][â]t
SFX C  ât  i       [^j][â]t
SFX C  ât  a       [^j][â]t
SFX C  ât  âm      [^j][â]t
SFX C  ât  ot      [^j][â]t
SFX C  ât  iet     [^j][â]t
SFX C  çt  u       [ç]t
SFX C  çt  i       [ç]t
SFX C  çt  0       [ç]t
SFX C  çt  am      [ç]t
SFX C  çt  at      [ç]t
SFX C  çt  iet     [ç]t
SFX C  çt  ot      [ç]t
SFX C  ît  u       [î]t
SFX C  ît  i       [î]t
SFX C  ît  a       [î]t
SFX C  ît  âm      [î]t
SFX C  ît  ât      [î]t
SFX C  ît  iet     [î]t
SFX C  ît  ot      [î]t

SFX c Y 25
SFX c  0   ies    [â]t
SFX c  ât  os     [â]t
SFX c  ât  ies    [â]t
SFX c  t   mies   [â]t
SFX c  ât  ieties [â]t
SFX c  ât  oties  [â]t
SFX c  t   ðoties [â]t
SFX c  0   ies    [ç]t
SFX c  çt  os     [ç]t
SFX c  çt  ies    [ç]t
SFX c  çt  as     [ç]t
SFX c  çt  amies  [ç]t
SFX c  çt  aties  [ç]t
SFX c  çt  ieties [ç]t
SFX c  çt  oties  [ç]t
SFX c  t   ðoties [ç]t
SFX c  0   ies    [î]t
SFX c  ît  os     [î]t
SFX c  ît  ies    [î]t
SFX c  ît  âs     [î]t
SFX c  ît  âmies  [î]t
SFX c  ît  âties  [î]t
SFX c  ît  ieties [î]t
SFX c  ît  oties  [î]t
SFX c  t   ðoties [î]t

SFX M Y 4
SFX M   t    dams    t
SFX M   t    dama    t
SFX M   t    dami    t
SFX M   t    damas   t

SFX N Y 4
SFX N   st   zdams   [s]t
SFX N   st   zdama   [s]t
SFX N   st   zdami   [s]t
SFX N   st   zdamas  [s]t

SFX [ Y 4
SFX [   t    damies    [^s]t
SFX [   t    damâs     [^s]t
SFX [   st   zdamies [s]t
SFX [   st   zdamâs  [s]t

SFX ] Y 3
SFX ]   t    ðanos     [^sz]t
SFX ]   st   ðanos     [s]t
SFX ]   zt   ðanos     [z]t

SFX { Y 2
SFX { t  juðies    t
SFX { t  jusies    t

SFX p Y 1
SFX p t  joðies    t

SFX } Y 6
SFX } t  uðies    [^âçî]t
SFX } t  usies    [^âçî]t
SFX } t  oðies    [^âçî]t
SFX } ât  oðies    [â]t
SFX } çt  oðies    [ç]t
SFX } ît  oðies    [î]t

SFX Z Y 23
SFX Z   t   stams     t
SFX Z   t   stama     t
SFX Z   t   stamam    t
SFX Z   t   stamu     t
SFX Z   t   stamâ     t
SFX Z   t   stamas    t
SFX Z   t   stamai    t
SFX Z   t   stami     t
SFX Z   t   stamiem   t
SFX Z   t   stamus    t
SFX Z   t   stamos    t
SFX Z   t   stamâm    t
SFX Z   t   stamâs    t
SFX Z   t   stamais   t
SFX Z   t   stamajam  t
SFX Z   t   stamo     t
SFX Z   t   stamajâ   t
SFX Z   t   stamajai  t
SFX Z   t   stamie    t
SFX Z   t   stamajiem t
SFX Z   t   stamajos  t
SFX Z   t   stamajâm  t
SFX Z   t   stamajâs  t

SFX )   Y 23
SFX )   t   jams     t
SFX )   t   jama     t
SFX )   t   jamam    t
SFX )   t   jamu     t
SFX )   t   jamâ     t
SFX )   t   jamas    t
SFX )   t   jamai    t
SFX )   t   jami     t
SFX )   t   jamiem   t
SFX )   t   jamus    t
SFX )   t   jamos    t
SFX )   t   jamâm    t
SFX )   t   jamâs    t
SFX )   t   jamais   t
SFX )   t   jamajam  t
SFX )   t   jamo     t
SFX )   t   jamajâ   t
SFX )   t   jamajai  t
SFX )   t   jamie    t
SFX )   t   jamajiem t
SFX )   t   jamajos  t
SFX )   t   jamajâm  t
SFX )   t   jamajâs  t
