lib/dict/lv_LV.dic
aizsnigt/+9M7BI4J
aiztuğçt/+)IBbHM$J1
aizvietot/+[{.)Gg1b,I$dBpMHJ]
apcirst/I+NJ]B4d[7
apcukurot/1IBb+M$)J{gGd[]Hp
apdvest/3e+FI
apirt/+I(hd[6eB]5}
apkârnît/g1+bc(MJdBh{IC[]
apkâsçt/)HJ+$IMbB1
aplakt/MTd+9BJ[7I4]
aplavçt/BbH$)+JI1M
apmaurot/+dIHg)BbG1${MJ[]p
apmirgot/+$bBI)HJM1
apmçïot/)Hg$b+I1BG{dJ[M]p
apnikt/4T+J]BI9dM[3
appût/+9B7ZI4JM^
apskaidrot/)+1IBdb{$gHpG[JM]
apspridzinât/BdbIJ]+c(g[1h}{MC
apçnot/HgbG+1d)JIB$[Mp{]
ataicinât/hIB(gb+JCcMd[]}{1
atciest/JN
atdâvinât/b+hMCIJ(B1
atkrist/3Id+B[N]J
atlikt/BI+J9dT47[M]
atmiecçt/+dJ)BI1Mgb]$HG{[p
atmçrcçt/[+p$)IdJGgBb{1H]M
atpampt/+^MJI7eZB4
atperçt/$)+gJBdbGI1Hp{][M
atpumpçt/+Ig)dJ]$bG1B,.[{pHM
atruğinât/I+bhcM[dB(]Jg1{C}
atsaistît/*b+{(IhgBcMd&J1[]C
atstostît/c+Mhb(Ig[J]1d{BC
attarkğíinât/+b[JhIBd(g{c1}CM]
attçlot/{$I+gBGp)HbdMJ[1]
attçst/30+F
attîrît/Ibh(Jc{g+M[*]dBC&1
atğaudît/+bBd(chJ{Ig[M1C]
atğíîst/I+%bJEN7
caurumot/+JI$GgM)d{HbpB][1
deìenerçt/+I[.,Gb)$dBpgH*{JM&1]
dublçt/M$I+{)1gJpbHGdB[]
dzesçt/$+{Idg1b)BpJH[]GM
dzîslot/$+)JbBI1MH
gurt/+B4IJM^e7Z
gût/]MJ9+7RB4IZd[^
ieblîkğíçt/cb+d[h}IgBC(J1]M{
iedot/+dBIMJ][
iedrebçt/+dIB(cJb{hgC1}M[]
iekniest/eJIM3F
iekurkstçt/gMh+Jbc(BdI{1][C}
iepogât/Jg+)b$[IBdGMH]{1p
iesapòot/+bB)${gHGJ]I1Md[p
ieskât/+b$){dJIg[MBHG1p]
iesmilkstçt/M+Ihb({gBdJ][c}C1
iesoïot/+]Jb)GgM{$dBI1Hp[
iespiest/J0N
ietirpst/+7
ietvîkt/+9Z^IJB74M
ievçst/I+F3JeM
ieíepinât/[hC}+IJgcbd(BM{1]
indçt/bB$IHgJ)+MGd{[1p]
iniciçt/+)b[dIBg1MHG]J$p{
izbaidît/+dhcBMb(gIJ{1[C]
izgânît/1BI+hJc(bdg{M[]C
izklepot/)+[G$gJbHBd1I]pM{
izmakğíerçt/$+b1I{BHgJ)[pMGd]
izmargot/H+I$Mb)pBGg1J]d[{
izmest/B+NdI43[
izmçslot/+M$IBb1JH
izpogot/+G[)$gHb1dIBMp{J]
izskaust/0N
izsolît/b(+hcIBd[g]J{C1M
izstençt/ch+bJ]C(I{dBM}1g[
izstostît/(b+chBdIJ[]M{1gC
izstumdît/(c+dBghb[I]JM{1C
izsvîst/+7I%JbNE
iztrinkğíinât/+[hICcB1(]Jb{dMg}
izvârgt/^+BJZM9I4
izvçcinât/hg+(bIcB]Jd[{1}MC
kaïíot/+)$HgbI{G[BJdM1]p
krokot/+IHg$BJ)1pdGbM{[]
kvantçt/I1b+$B)MHJ
kâst/+eTIF3]
laíçt/bB$IHJ)+M1
lçninât/(+1BIdgcb{[Jh}C]M
lûrçt/b(BIChJ+M1
miekğíçt/G{+bIgdJ]H$)B1p[M
mçrdçt/+[bGBd)HgI{MJ]$p1
mçtât/gBI$+G{bHd)1[JMp]
nobuldurçt/+Gg$MBd,)bpHIJ1{[].
nodrupinât/dB+]JI(hcg1b{}[CM
noelst/+ITeF3]
noiet/+8IBdJ][M
nokalst/B+%IN4J7
nokağòât/)+gHbGIB{d[$1J]Mp
nokunkstçt/+b(IChBMJ1
nolobt/+)$6IeB4
nolîkt/^B9+Z4J7IM
nomierinât/+&I*g1b{(Jdh[cBMC]}
nonâvçt/$+G[)bHp{gJIBd1M]
nopost/+FIe3
noreibt/+I7BeZ^4MJ
norûkt/+[IdB%9J5]6M
nosildît/d+b(g[IhJMBc]{1C
nosunît/+$bB]J)Gp{M1gH[Id
notrenkât/+)[M&gH$*bBpIdJG]1{
notîstît/cIh+b(dg]J[{MBC1
nozvçrinât/+MJdChbg(BIc1][{}
noğíîst/I+bJNE7
noğíîvot/+)b$IJ1BMH
noğòakstinât/+b(g1JIdBh[]cC{}M
paberzçt/MBIg+)$db[HGJ{]1p
padomât/+$)gHb[IMp1BGJ{d]
pagrimt/+BZIeM7J^4
pagrçkot/{1BI+b)Jd$gHGM[p]
pagût/+97BZIJ^4M
paknibinât/+b(1IBJhCM
pakoklçt/{+)]Jd$bHg[GIpMB1
pakustçt/+]bJI1g[{MdC}cB
pakâst/I3+
palaistît/1IB+b{cg[(J]MhdC
paskrâpçt/d+p$GI[g1)bBH]JM{
paskrûvçt/dbHgG+$pIB1J)M][{
pastûrçt/+bI)$J1BMH
pasvilt/+4IBZe^JM7
patirpst/7+
pavirinât/Ic+Jdh{bB1(gM][C}
paviïât/+bIg)$MHdBGJ{[1]p
pavîst/+J%B4N7
paíîlât/H+p$)IG[d{bg1]JBM
piecûkot/+&b*)IdgHGJB$p{M[1]
piedvest/+e3FI
piekoklçt/+J]IB)gMHGb[${d1p
pielasît/+Ibd{hJ](c&*[MB1gC
piepçkğíçt/+(bB1IChJM
pieskumt/Z^+7BeIJM4
piesnaust/N0J
piestâdît/BdI+[(b1ch]JgC{M
piesviedrçt/)+JbHI$B1M
pievîlçt/bH+)I$JB1M
pliíçt/H+b)BM$I1J
plostot/+)Bd$1IbgJ{MH[Gp]
prostituçt/+bgJ)I$H{p]dMGB1[
pârklât/+Ig]$1)GbdB[{6p
pârknakğíinât/b+IhCc(BJ]g}[Md{1
pârkrist/+BN3JId[]
pârlaidinât/(1g+dM[cBCbJ]Ih{}
pârlîgot/g+b)J$BdGI[1{MpH]
pârmest/+[3IdB4N
pârrîvçt/+BIb{)G$gMJ[pH]1d
pârsiet/47B+MJId[]
pârskurbt/^+ZeIM7BJ4
pârskâbt/+eZJI7B^4M
pârstiklot/+bI)BJH$M1
pârtransportçt/)Gb]J+IM1gBH$d[{p
saasinât/+c(dMb[gIhBJ1C*&]}{
sabriedinât/+hJdB{bC[}(cgIM]1
sacirst/+BIdJN4[7]
sacirtot/)+b$I]JGHgdB1M{[p
sadzert/JBdI(6h5M[]
sadziedât/Jb+BdI1ghcM]{}[
sagaidît/+bJI(1gdCBMh]c[{
sakausçt/+Mbd$JIpg{HGB)1[]
sakvçpt/+eZ4B^MI7J
salodçt/I+dJ]${bpBHgG)1[M
salt/e+ZI^7BJ4M
samaitât/Id+J$)Mb{g1HGBp[]
samest/dBI4[+N3
samudşinât/+IcJbh]}d[(Bg{1CM
samuïïât/+[J$gGMpIb)dBH1{]
sasvilt/+^IB4eZJ7M
savaldît/+h(cCBgbdJ]{IM1[
savest/+IJbEN[]
sazagt/+dMI9JB4[]7
sazeltît/b+IJ{dB)gG]M1$[Hp
saziepçt/+bgHGIB)$[1{dMJ]p
saşût/+^7BIZJ9M4
solît/gb+I(Bhcd]J[{1CM
stabulçt/+IJbM$B1)H
stindzinât/C+I(1hJbBM
stîdzçt/+(hJbIBMC1
trûcinât/hc+b(IB1gdJ{[C}M]
uzkuplinât/+hJbdI(c1B[g}{CM]
uzmanît/(c+hdJbCBM1Ig{[]
uzplât/+$)gd1bB6GI[]{p
uzpost/+ITe]3F
uzrakt/d+9I[7BTJ4]M
uzsarmot/+I1Bb$J)HM
uzstîvçt/1IBb+G$g)pJHdM[{]
uzsvîtrot/+)M$IbJBH1
uzviest/MJ
vizuïot/M+IB1d)GHgb$Jp[{]
çst/b[J+I8E]N
íiíinât/+hBd[I(c{JC1gM]b}
ğïakstinât/+g1[I(bdBhc{JCM]}
şirgt/+9Z^MBJ40
